hu: Üvegkemence-vezérlő típusa: Digitális (nem programozható); Digitális, programozható; Kézi (fokozatmentes kapcsoló); Vezérlő nélkül; Érintőképernyős, programozható; Wi-Fi / alkalmazással vezérelhető; Egyéb
es: Tipo de controlador de horno de vidrio: Digital (no programable); Digital programable; Manual (interruptor infinito); Controlador no incluido; Pantalla táctil programable; Habilitado para wifi/aplicación; Otro
fi: Lasiuunin säätölaitteen tyyppi: Digitaalinen (ei-ohjelmoitava); Digitaalinen ohjelmoitava; Manuaalinen (portaaton kytkin); Ei sisällä ohjainta; Ohjelmoitava kosketusnäyttö; Wi-Fi- / sovellusohjattava; Muu
nb: Glassovn kontrollør/behandlingsansvarlig type: Digital (ikke-programmerbar); Digital programmerbar; Manuell (trinnløs bryter); Ingen kontroller inkludert; Programmerbar berøringsskjerm; Wi-Fi-/app-aktivert; Annet
lt-LT: Stiklo krosnies valdiklio tipas: Skaitmeninis (neprogramuojamas); Skaitmeninis programuojamas; Rankinis (belaipsnis jungiklis); Be valdiklio; Programuojamas liečiamuoju ekranu; Su „Wi-Fi“ / programėle; Kita
ro-RO: Tipul controlerului pentru cuptorul de sticlă: Digital (neprogramabil); Digital programabil; Manual (comutator infinit); Niciun controler inclus; Ecran tactil programabil; Compatibil cu Wi‑Fi/Aplicație; Altele
zh-CN: 玻璃窑炉控制器类型: 数字（不可编程）; 数字可编程; 手动（无级开关）; 不包含控制器; 触摸屏可编程; 启用 Wi-Fi/应用; 其他
ru: Тип контроллера стекловарной печи: Цифровой (непрограммируемый); Цифровой программируемый; Ручной (бесступенчатый переключатель); Без контроллера в комплекте; Сенсорный программируемый; С поддержкой Wi‑Fi / приложения; Другое
zh-TW: 玻璃窯爐控制器類型: 數位 (不可編程); 數位可編程; 手動 (無段開關); 不含控制器; 觸控螢幕可編程; 支援 Wi‑Fi/應用程式; 其他
sl-SI: Vrsta krmilnika steklarske peči: Digitalen (neprogramirljiv); Digitalen, programirljiv; Ročno (brezstopenjsko stikalo); Brez krmilnika; Zaslon na dotik, programirljiv; S podporo za Wi-Fi/aplikacijo; Drugo
it: Forno per vetro titolare del trattamento tipo: Digitale (non programmabile); Digitale programmabile; Manuale (interruttore infinito); Nessun controller incluso; Touchscreen programmabile; Wi-Fi/abilitato per app; Altro
pt-PT: Tipo de controlador de forno de vidro: Digital (não programável); Digital programável; Manual (interruptor infinito); Sem controlador incluído; Ecrã tátil programável; Com Wi-Fi/aplicação; Outro
pl: Typ sterownika pieca do szkła: Cyfrowy (nieprogramowalny); Cyfrowy programowalny; Ręczny (włącznik bezstopniowy); Brak sterownika w zestawie; Programowalny z ekranem dotykowym; Z Wi-Fi / aplikacją; Inny
bg-BG: Тип контролер за пещ за стъкло: Цифров (непрограмируем); Цифров програмируем; Ръчен (безстепенен превключвател); Не е включен контролер; Сензорен екран (програмируем); С поддръжка на Wi-Fi/приложение; Друго
ja: ガラス窯コントローラータイプ: デジタル (非プログラム式); デジタルプログラム式; 手動 (インフィニットスイッチ); コントローラーなし; タッチスクリーンプログラム式; Wi‑Fi / アプリ対応; その他
cs: Typ sklářské pece: Digitální (neprogramovatelný); Digitální programovatelný; Manuální (plynulý regulátor); Regulátor není součástí dodávky; Dotykový programovatelný; S podporou Wi-Fi / aplikací; Ostatní
en: Glass kiln controller type: Digital (non-programmable); Digital programmable; Manual (infinite switch); No controller included; Touchscreen programmable; Wi‑Fi/App-enabled; Other
th: ประเภทตัวควบคุมเตาเผาแก้ว: ดิจิทัล (ตั้งโปรแกรมไม่ได้); ดิจิทัล (ตั้งโปรแกรมได้); แมนนวล (สวิตช์อนันต์); ไม่รวมตัวควบคุม; หน้าจอสัมผัส (ตั้งโปรแกรมได้); รองรับ Wi-Fi/แอป; อื่นๆ
de: Art der Glasofensteuerung: Digital (nicht programmierbar); Digital programmierbar; Manuell (Stufenlos regelbar); Ohne Steuerung; Touchscreen programmierbar; WLAN-/App-fähig; Sonstige
vi: Loại bộ điều khiển lò nung thủy tinh: Kỹ thuật số (không lập trình được); Kỹ thuật số lập trình được; Thủ công (công tắc vô cấp); Không kèm bộ điều khiển; Màn hình cảm ứng lập trình được; Hỗ trợ Wi-Fi/Ứng dụng; Khác
el: Τύπος ελεγκτή κλιβάνου υαλουργίας: Ψηφιακό (μη προγραμματιζόμενο); Ψηφιακό προγραμματιζόμενο; Χειροκίνητο (διακόπτης infinite); Δεν περιλαμβάνεται ελεγκτής; Προγραμματιζόμενο με οθόνη αφής; Με υποστήριξη Wi-Fi/Εφαρμογής; Άλλο
hr-HR: Glass kiln voditelj obrade tipa: Digitalni (bez mogućnosti programiranja); Digitalni s mogućnošću programiranja; Ručni (beskonačni prekidač); Kontroler nije uključen; Dodirni zaslon s mogućnošću programiranja; S omogućenom Wi‑Fi mrežom / aplikacijom; Ostalo
tr: Cam fırını kontrol cihazı türü: Dijital (programlanamayan); Programlanabilir dijital; Manuel (kademesiz anahtar); Denetleyici dahil değil; Dokunmatik ekranlı programlanabilir; Wi-Fi/Uygulama destekli; Diğer
ko: 유리 가마 컨트롤러 유형: 디지털(프로그래밍 불가); 디지털(프로그래밍 가능); 수동(무한 스위치); 컨트롤러 미포함; 터치스크린 프로그래밍 가능; Wi-Fi/앱 지원; 기타
sk-SK: Typ ovládača sklárskej pece: Digitálny (neprogramovateľný); Digitálny programovateľný; Manuálny (plynulá regulácia); Bez ovládača; Dotykový programovateľný; S podporou Wi-Fi/aplikácie; Iné
sv: Typ av styrenhet för glasugn: Digital (ej programmerbar); Digital programmerbar; Manuell (steglös brytare); Ingen styrenhet ingår; Programmerbar pekskärm; Wi‑Fi/app-aktiverad; Övrigt
fr: Type de contrôleur du four à verre: Numérique (non programmable); Numérique programmable; Manuel (commutateur infini); Aucun contrôleur inclus; Tactile programmable; Connecté en Wi-Fi/Par application; Autre
nl: Regelaartype van glasoven: Digitaal (niet programmeerbaar); Digitaal programmeerbaar; Handmatig (traploze schakelaar); Geen controller inbegrepen; Touchscreen programmeerbaar; Wifi/app-ondersteund; Overig
pt-BR: Tipo de controlador para forno de vidro: Digital (não programável); Digital programável; Manual (interruptor infinito); Nenhum controlador incluído; Touchscreen programável; Habilitado para Wi-Fi/App; Outro
da: Styringstype for glasovn: Digital (ikke-programmerbar); Digital programmerbar; Manuel (trinløs kontakt); Ingen controller medfølger; Touchscreen-programmerbar; Med wi-fi/app; Andet